Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Professional Counselors.

Sec. 08.29.010.
Board creation; membership.

There is established the Board of Professional Counselors consisting of five members appointed by the governor, one of whom is a public member and four of whom are licensed professional counselors.

In addition to the requirements for public members under AS

08.01.025

, the public member of the board may not

ever have been a licensed professional counselor or employed in a commercial or professional field related to counseling; or

live in a household with a person who is or has been, or have an immediate family member who is or has been, a licensed professional counselor or employed in a commercial or professional field related to professional counseling; in this paragraph, “immediate family member” means a parent, sibling, or child related by blood, marriage, or adoption.

Of the four counselor members of the board, at least one shall be employed in the private sector and at least one shall be employed in the public sector.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.29.020.
Duties of the board.

In addition to the duties specified in AS 08.01, the board shall

license professional counselors, establish criteria for supervisor certification, and certify approved counselor supervisors under this chapter; the board may provide for licensure in areas of counseling specialization;

establish continuing education requirements for the renewal of a license under this chapter;

adopt, by regulation, a code of ethics that must be observed by persons licensed under this chapter;

establish education and training requirements that must be met before a professional counselor can administer and use assessment instruments described in AS

08.29.490

(1)(C); and

enforce the provisions of this chapter and adopt regulations necessary to carry out the board’s duties under this chapter.

The board may delegate to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, and the department may perform, a duty for which the board has authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 62, art. 1.

For supervision, see 12 AAC 62, art. 2.

For license renewal and reinstatement; continuing education, see 12 AAC 62, art. 3.